Georgia, session 2025_26, HB161.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
- 1 -

25 LC 62 0177S
15 PART I
16 SECTION 1-1.
17 Article 1 of Chapter 3 of Title 35 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
18 general provisions relative to the Georgia Bureau of Investigation, is amended by revising
19 Code Section 35-3-4.1, relating to subpoena for production of electronic communication
20 service records for computer or electronic device used in furtherance of certain offenses
21 against minors, as follows:
22 "35-3-4.1.
23 (a)(1) In any investigation of a violation of Code Section 16-12-100, 16-12-100.1,
24 or 16-12-100.2 involving the use of a computer or an electronic device in furtherance of
25 an act related to a minor, or any investigation of a violation of Article 8 of Chapter 9 of
26 Title 16, the The director, assistant director of the bureau, or deputy director for
27 investigations of the bureau shall be authorized to issue a subpoena, with the consent of
28 the Attorney General, to compel the production of electronic communication service or
29 remote communication computing service records or other information pertaining to a
30 subscriber or customer of such service, exclusive of contents of communications, in any
31 investigation of a violation of:
32 (A) Code Section 16-12-100, 16-12-100.1, or 16-12-100.2 involving the use of a
33 computer or an electronic device in furtherance of an act related to a minor;
34 (B) Article 8 of Chapter 9 of Title 16; or
35 (C) Code Section 16-9-93, 16-10-28, 16-11-37, 16-11-39.1, or 16-11-221.
36 (2) A provider of electronic communication service or remote computing service shall
37 disclose to the bureau the following as relative to the subscriber or customer of such
38 service:
39 (A) Name;
40 (B) Address;
- 2 -

25 LC 62 0177S
41 (C) Local and long distance telephone connection records, or records of session times
42 and durations;
43 (D) Length of service, including the start date, and types of service utilized;
44 (E) Telephone or instrument number or other subscriber number or identity, including
45 any temporarily assigned network address; and
46 (F) Means and source of payment for such service, including any credit card or bank
47 account number of a subscriber to or customer of such service.
48 (3) A provider of electronic communication service or remote computing service shall
49 not provide notification of the subpoena issued pursuant to paragraph (1) of this
50 subsection to the subscriber or customer of such service.
51 (b) Upon failure of a person without lawful excuse to obey a subpoena, the director,
52 assistant director of the bureau, or the deputy director for investigations of the bureau,
53 through the Attorney General or district attorney, may apply to a superior court having
54 jurisdiction for an order compelling compliance. Such person may object to the subpoena
55 on grounds that it fails to comply with this Code section or upon any constitutional or other
56 legal right or privilege of such person. The court may issue an order modifying or setting
57 aside such subpoena or directing compliance with the original subpoena. Failure to obey
58 a subpoena issued under this Code section may be punished by the court as contempt of
59 court.
60 (c) The Attorney General may request that a natural person who refuses to produce
61 relevant matter included in a subpoena issued pursuant to this Code section on the ground
62 that the production of such records may incriminate such person be ordered by the court
63 to provide such records. With the exception of a prosecution for perjury, a natural person
64 who complies with the court order to provide such records asserting a privilege against
65 self-incrimination to which he or she is entitled by law shall not be prosecuted or subjected
66 to any penalty or forfeiture for or on account of any transaction, matter, or thing concerning
67 which he or she may testify or produce evidence, documentary or otherwise.
- 3 -

25 LC 62 0177S
68 (d)(1) The issuance of a subpoena pursuant to this Code section shall not be made public
69 during any pending investigation or prosecution of criminal or unlawful activity beyond
70 the extent necessary for the issuance and compliance of the subpoena and compliance
71 with Chapter 16 of Title 17.
72 (2) Information obtained pursuant to a subpoena enforced by this Code section shall not
73 be made public or, except as authorized in paragraph (2)(3) of this subsection, disclosed
74 by the director of the bureau, assistant director, deputy director for investigations of the
75 bureau, or the director's employees beyond the extent necessary for the enforcement of
76 this Code section.
77 (2)(3) The director, assistant director of the bureau, deputy director for investigations of
78 the bureau, or the director's employees shall be authorized to provide to any federal, state,
79 or local law enforcement agency any information acquired under this Code section in
80 furtherance of a criminal investigation in violation of Code Section 16-12-100,
81 16-12-100.1, or 16-12-100.2.
82 (e) As used in this Code section, the terms 'electronic communication service' and 'remote
83 computing service' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 16-9-92."
84 PART II
85 SECTION 2-1.
86 Title 16 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to crimes and offenses, is
87 amended in Code Section 16-11-220, relating to definitions relative to domestic terrorism,
88 as follows:
89 "16-11-220.
90 As used in this article, the term:
91 (1) 'Assassination' means the intentional killing of an elected public official by an
92 individual acting to prevent or retaliate for the performance of official duties or because
93 of the public position held by the official.
- 4 -

25 LC 62 0177S
94 (2) 'Critical infrastructure' means publicly or privately owned facilities, systems,
95 functions, or assets, whether physical or virtual, providing or distributing services for the
96 benefit of the public, including, but not limited to, energy, fuel, water, agriculture, health
97 care, finance, communication, or any other vital public service.
98 (2) 'Domestic terrorism' means any felony violation of, or attempt to commit a felony
99 violation of the laws of this state which, as part of a single unlawful act or a series of
100 unlawful acts which are interrelated by distinguishing characteristics, is intended to cause
101 serious bodily harm, kill any individual or group of individuals, or disable or destroy
102 critical infrastructure, a state or government facility, or a public transportation system
103 when such disability or destruction results in major economic loss, and is intended to:
104 (A) Intimidate the civilian population of this state or any of its political subdivisions;
105 (B) Alter, change, or coerce the policy of the government of this state or any of its
106 political subdivisions by intimidation or coercion; or
107 (C) Affect the conduct of the government of this state or any of its political
108 subdivisions by use of destructive devices, assassination, or kidnapping.
109 (3) 'Public transportation system' means all facilities, conveyances, and instrumentalities,
110 whether publicly or privately owned, that are used in or for publicly available services
111 for the transportation of individuals or cargo.
112 (4) 'Serious bodily harm' means harm to the body of another by depriving him or her of
113 a member of his or her body, by rendering a member of his or her body useless, or by
114 seriously disfiguring his or her body or a member thereof.
115 (5) 'State or government facility' means any permanent or temporary facility or
116 conveyance that is used or occupied by representatives of this state or any of its political
117 subdivisions, by the legislature, by the judiciary, or by officials or employees of this state
118 or any of its political subdivisions.
119 (6) 'Vital public service' shall have the same meaning as provided in Code Section
120 16-7-22.
- 5 -

25 LC 62 0177S
121 SECTION 2-2.
122 Said title is further amended by revising Code Section 16-11-221, relating to penalties for
123 domestic terrorism, as follows:
124 "16-11-221.
125 (a) A person commits the crime of domestic terrorism when he or she commits or attempts
126 to commit a felony violation of the laws of this state which, as part of a single unlawful act
127 or a series of unlawful acts which are interrelated by distinguishing characteristics, is
128 intended to cause serious bodily harm, kill any individual or group of individuals, or
129 disable or destroy critical infrastructure, a state or government facility, or a public
130 transportation system when such disability or destruction results in major economic loss,
131 and is intended to:
132 (1) Intimidate the civilian population of this state or any of its political subdivisions;
133 (2) Alter, change, or coerce the policy of the government of this state or any of its
134 political subdivisions by intimidation or coercion; or
135 (3) Affect the conduct of the government of this state or any of its political subdivisions
136 by use of destructive devices, assassination, or kidnapping.
137 (b) Any person who commits domestic terrorism shall be guilty of a felony and upon
138 conviction thereof shall be punished as follows:
139 (1) If death results to any individual, by death, by imprisonment for life without parole,
140 or by imprisonment for life;
141 (2) If kidnapping occurs, by imprisonment for not less than 15 nor more than 35 years,
142 or by imprisonment for life;
143 (3) If serious bodily harm occurs, by imprisonment for not less than 15 nor more than 35
144 years; or
145 (4) If critical infrastructure, a state or government facility, or a public transportation
146 system is disabled or destroyed, by imprisonment for not less than five nor more than 35
147 years.
- 6 -

25 LC 62 0177S
148 (b)(c) No sentence imposed under this Code section shall be suspended, stayed, probated,
149 deferred, or withheld by the sentencing court; provided, however, that in the court's
150 discretion, the court may suspend, stay, probate, defer, or withhold part of such sentence
151 when the prosecuting attorney and the defendant have agreed to such sentence."
152 SECTION 2-3.
153 Said title is further amended in Code Section 16-14-3, relating to definitions relative to
154 racketeer influenced and corrupt organizations, by revising subparagraph (B) of paragraph
155 (4) as follows:
156 "(B) Engaging in any one or more acts of domestic terrorism as described in paragraph
157 (2) of Code Section 16-11-220 16-11-221 or any criminal attempt, criminal solicitation,
158 or criminal conspiracy related thereto."
159 SECTION 2-4.
160 Code Section 20-3-10 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to sanctuary
161 policies prohibited and penalty for violation, by revising paragraph (4) of subsection (a) as
162 follows:
163 "(4) 'Status information' means any information, not including any information required
164 by law to be kept confidential but otherwise including, but not limited to, any statement,
165 document, computer generated data, recording, or photograph, which is relevant to the
166 identity or location of an individual who is reasonably believed to be violating state or
167 federal laws, illegally residing within the United States, or who is reasonably believed to
168 be involved in domestic terrorism as that term is defined in Code Section 16-11-220 in
169 violation of Code Section 16-11-221 or a terroristic act as that term is defined by Code
170 Section 35-3-62."
- 7 -

25 LC 62 0177S
171 SECTION 2-5.
172 Code Section 36-80-23 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to prohibition on
173 immigration sanctuary policies by local governmental entities, certification of compliance,
174 and punishment, by revising paragraph (3) of subsection (a) as follows:
175 "(3) 'Immigration status information' means any information, not including any
176 information required by law to be kept confidential but otherwise including, but not
177 limited to, any statement, document, computer generated data, recording, or photograph,
178 which is relevant to immigration status or the identity or location of an individual who
179 is reasonably believed to be illegally residing within the United States or who is
180 reasonably believed to be involved in domestic terrorism as that term is defined in Code
181 Section 16-11-220 in violation of Code Section 16-11-221 or a terroristic act as that term
182 is defined by Code Section 35-3-62."
183 SECTION 2-6.
184 Code Section 38-3-40 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to definitions
185 relative to the Board of Homeland Security, by revising paragraph (4) as follows:
186 "(4) 'Domestic terrorism' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section
187 16-11-220.means an offense of Code Section 16-11-221."
188 PART III
189 SECTION 3-1.
190 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
- 8 -